Utah statutes.
73-3-16.   Proof of appropriation or permanent change -- Notice -- Manner of
proof -- Statements -- Maps, profiles, and drawings -- Verification -- Waiver
of filing -- Statement in lieu of proof of appropriation or change.
(1)  Sixty days before the date set for the proof of appropriation or proof of
change to be made, the state engineer shall notify the applicant by mail when
proof of completion of the works and application of the water to a beneficial
use will be due.
(2)  On or before the date set for completing the proof in accordance with the
application, the applicant shall file proof with the state engineer on forms
furnished by the state engineer.
(3)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), the applicant shall submit the
following information:
(a)  a description of the works constructed;
(b)  the quantity of water in acre-feet or the flow in second-feet diverted,
or both;
(c)  the method of applying the water to beneficial use; and
(d) (i)  detailed measurements of water put to beneficial use;
(ii)  the date the measurements were made; and
(iii)  the name of the person making the measurements.
(4) (a)  On applications filed for appropriation or permanent change of use of
water to provide a water supply for state projects constructed pursuant to
Title 73, Chapter 10, Board of Water Resources - Division of Water Resources,
or for federal projects constructed by the United States Bureau of Reclamation
for the use and benefit of the state, any of its agencies, its political
subdivisions, public and quasi-municipal corporations, or water users'
associations of which the state, its agencies, political subdivisions, or
public and quasi-municipal corporations are stockholders, the proof shall
include:
(i) a statement indicating construction of the project works has been
completed;
(ii)  a description of the major features with appropriate maps, profiles,
drawings, and reservoir area-capacity curves;
(iii)  a description of the point or points of diversion and rediversion;
(iv)  project operation data;
(v)  a map showing the place of use of water and a statement of the purpose
and method of use;
(vi)  the project plan for beneficial use of water under the applications and
the quantity of water required; and
(vii)  a statement indicating what type of measuring devices have been
installed.
(b)  The director of the Division of Water Resources shall sign proofs for the
state projects and an authorized official of the Bureau of Reclamation shall
sign proofs for the federal projects specified in Subsection (4)(a).
(5)  The proof on all applications shall be sworn to by the applicant or the
applicant's appointed representative and proof engineer.
(6) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (6)(b), when filing proof, the
applicant shall submit maps, profiles, and drawings made by a Utah licensed
land surveyor or Utah licensed professional engineer that show:
(i)  the location of the completed works;
(ii)  the nature and extent of the completed works;
(iii)  the natural stream or source from which and the point where the water
is diverted and, in the case of a nonconsumptive use, the point where the
water is returned; and
(iv)  the place of use.
(b)  The state engineer may waive the filing of maps, profiles, and drawings
if in the state engineer's opinion the written proof adequately describes the
works and the nature and extent of beneficial use.
(7)  The completed proof shall conform to rules and standards established by
the state engineer.
(8)  In those areas in which general determination proceedings are pending, or
have been concluded, under Title 73, Chapter 4, Determination of Water Rights,
the state engineer may petition the district court for permission to:
(a)  waive the requirements of this section and Section 73-3-17; and
(b)  permit each owner of an application to file a verified statement to the
effect that the applicant has completed the appropriation or change and elects
to file a statement of water users claim in the proposed determination of
water rights or any supplement to it in accordance with Title 73, Chapter 4,
Determination of Water Rights, in lieu of proof of appropriation or proof of
change.
(9)  This section does not apply to an instream flow water right authorized by
Section 73-3-30.
